North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-25 Postsecondary Enrollment

15.1-25-01.
Postsecondary enrollment options program.

Any North Dakota student enrolled in grade ten, eleven, or twelve in a public high school is eligible to receive high school and postsecondary credit for the successful completion of an academic course offered by any postsecondary institution accredited by a regional accrediting organization or a career and technical education course offered by a postsecondary institution in a program accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization recognized by the United States department of education.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15; 2003, ch. 138, § 66; 2009, ch. 178, § 1.

15.1-25-02.
Permission to enroll — Notification — Credits.

Before enrolling in a course for credit under this chapter, the student must obtain written permission from the student’s school district superintendent. The student’s school district superintendent shall determine the number of credits for which the student is eligible and shall include the number of credits on the document granting permission required by this section. For purposes of determining credit, a three-semester-hour course offered by a postsecondary institution is equivalent to a full semester high school course. Upon the student’s successful completion of the course, the postsecondary institution shall notify the student’s school district superintendent of that fact.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15.

15.1-25-03.
Costs of attendance — Responsibility of student.

The student and the student’s parent or legal guardian are responsible for all costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “costs” includes tuition, fees, textbooks, materials, equipment, and other necessary charges related to the course in which the student has enrolled.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15.

15.1-25-04.
Transportation — Responsibility of student.

The student and the student’s parent or legal guardian are responsible for transportation arrangements and all costs of transportation associated with a student’s attendance at a postsecondary institution under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15.

15.1-25-05.
Per student payments — Extracurricular activities.

A student attending a postsecondary institution under this chapter is deemed to be in attendance at the student’s school district of residence for purposes of calculating per student payments and for purposes relating to the student’s eligibility to participate in high school extracurricular activities.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15.

15.1-25-06.
Courses — Statutory and regulatory exemption.

The courses for which dual high school and postsecondary credit are available under this chapter are postsecondary courses and are exempt from any statutory or regulatory provisions otherwise applicable to high school courses and to the individuals by whom high school courses are taught.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 15.